Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202021-218
Householding.

(MBCA 1.44) (a) A corporation has delivered
written notice or any other report or statement under the Nebraska Model Business
Corporation Act, the articles of incorporation, or the bylaws to all shareholders
who share a common address if:

(1) The corporation delivers
one copy of the notice, report, or statement to the common address;

(2) The corporation addresses
the notice, report, or statement to those shareholders as a group, to each
of those shareholders individually, or to the shareholders in a form to which
each of those shareholders has consented; and

(3) Each of those shareholders consents
to delivery of a single copy of such notice, report, or statement to the shareholders'
common address. Any such consent shall be revocable by any of such shareholders
who deliver written notice of revocation to the corporation. If such written
notice of revocation is delivered, the corporation shall begin providing individual
notices, reports, or other statements to the revoking shareholder no later
than thirty days after delivery of the written notice of revocation.

(b) Any shareholder who
fails to object by written notice to the corporation, within sixty days of
written notice by the corporation of its intention to send single copies of
notices, reports, or statements to shareholders who share a common address
as permitted by subsection (a) of this section, shall be deemed to have consented
to receiving such single copy at the common address.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 18.